Ohio, session 136, HB623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 1329.29 and 1329.99 be amended and sections 341.03, 753.022, 1329.291, 3313.8110, 3722.20, 5119.335, and 5120.101 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 341.03. (A) As used in this section: (1) "County correctional facility" has the same meaning as in section 341.42 of the Revised Code. (2) "Religious dietary food options" means meals that meet specific food and food preparation techniques that satisfy religious dietary requirements. (B) Each county correctional facility shall accommodate the mandatory dietary requirements of a recognized religion practiced by an inmate by offering religious dietary food options. Sec. 753.022. (A) As used in this section: (1)"Municipal correctional facility" has the same meaning as in section 753.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Religious dietary food options" means meals that meet specific food and food preparation techniques that satisfy religious dietary requirements. (B) Each municipal correctional facility shall accommodate the mandatory dietary requirements of a recognized religion practiced by an inmate by offering religious dietary food options. Sec. 1329.29. (A) As used in this section, "kosher" means supervised, prepared under, and maintained in strict compliance with the laws and customs of the Jewish religion, including the laws and customs of shechita requiring the slaughter of animals according to appropriate Jewish law, and in compliance with the strictest standards of Jewish law as expressed by reliable, recognized Jewish entities and Jewish rabbis. (B) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Sell or expose for sale at retail, or manufacture, any meat or meat preparations or any fowl or preparations from fowl and falsely represent the same to be "kosher" or as having been prepared under, and of a product or products sanctioned by, the Orthodox Hebrew religious requirements; (2) Falsely represent any food products or the contents of any package or container to be constituted and prepared as described in division (A)(1)(B)(1) of this section by having or permitting to be inscribed thereon "kosher," "kosher style," "kosher type," "kosher for passover," "Jewish," or "Hebrew" in any language, or have "kosher," "kosher style," "kosher type," "kosher for passover," "Jewish," or "Hebrew" inscribed on the front of any retail business establishment in any language except the terms "Jewish," "Hebrew," "kosher style," or "kosher type" may be used on packages or containers only if the packages or containers are also marked "nonkosher" in easily readable print; (3) Sell or expose for sale at retail in the same place of business both kosher and nonkosher meat or meat preparations either raw or prepared for human consumption unless hethe person indicates on histhe person's window signs and all display advertising in block letters at least four inches in height, "kosher and nonkosher food served here." However, if the person sells only kosher meat or kosher meat preparations that are prepackaged for sale, hethe person is exempt from this division. (4) Make any direct statement, either orally or in writing, display the words "kosher," "kosher style," "kosher type," "kosher for passover," "Jewish," or "Hebrew" in any language, or display any insignia, six-pointed star, or other mark that might reasonably be calculated to deceive or lead a reasonable person to believe a product is "kosher" or sanctioned by Orthodox Hebrew religious requirements, if it is not. (B)(C) All prepackaged meats and poultry sold or exposed for sale at retail as "kosher" shall be soaked and salted. All other fresh meats and poultry sold or exposed for sale at retail as "kosher" shall be marked, on the label when packaged or by a sign when not packaged, with the words "soaked and salted" or "not soaked and salted," whichever is applicable. All advertisements for food or food products sold or exposed for sale as "kosher" under rabbinical supervision must identify the name of the rabbi or organization, if any, that certified the food or food products as being "kosher." (C)(D) Any retailer who, at the end of the business day on the effective date of this amendment, has in histhe retailer's inventory products that are not "kosher" but are marked "kosher style," "kosher type," "kosher for passover," "Jewish," or "Hebrew" may continue to sell those products if hethe retailer marks them "nonkosher" either on their labels or on display advertising in block letters at least four inches in height. (D)(E) The department of agriculture shall enforce this section and for such purpose any person designated by the department may enter upon premises where food represented to be kosher is sold or exposed for sale, at any reasonable time during business hours to inspect such food. Whenever the department determines that a person is violating this section and has received no previous warning under this section, it shall issue a warning to that person specifying what actions hethe person needs to take in order to comply with this section and notifying himthe person that hethe person has ten days after his receipt of the warning to take those actions. If, at the end of the ten-day period, the department determines that the person still is not in compliance with this section, the violator is subject to strict criminal liability, as provided in division (B) of section 2901.21 of the Revised Code. If a person has received a previous warning under this section or has been found in violation of this section, hethe person shall receive no warning under this division concerning subsequent noncompliance with this section and is subject to strict criminal liability, as provided in division (B) of section 2901.21 of the Revised Code. No action may be maintained against a retail seller for a violation of this section unless: (1) HeThe retail seller fails to comply with a warning issued under division (D)(E) of this section; or (2) HeThe retail seller had actual knowledge or should have had knowledge that the product offered for sale did not comply with this section. Sec. 1329.291. (A) As used in this section, "halal" means prepared under and maintained in strict compliance with the laws and customs of the Islamic religion including the laws and customs of zabiha or zabeeha, slaughtered according to appropriate Islamic code, and as expressed by reliable, recognized Islamic entities and scholars. (B) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Sell or expose for sale at retail, or manufacture, any meat or meat preparations or any fowl or preparations from fowl and falsely represent the same to be halal; (2) Falsely represent any food products or the contents of any package or container to be constituted and prepared as described in division (B)(1) of this section by having or permitting to be inscribed thereon "halal," "Muslim," or "Islam" in any language, or having "halal," "Muslim," or "Islam" inscribed on the front of any retail business establishment in any language; (3) Sell or expose for sale at retail in the same place of business both halal and nonhalal meat or meat preparations either raw or prepared for human consumption unless indicated on window signs and all display advertising in block letters at least four inches in height, "halal and nonhalal food served here." A person who sells only halal meat or halal meat preparations that are prepackaged for sale is exempt from this division. (4) Make any direct statement, either orally or in writing, display the words "halal," "Muslim," or "Islam" in any language, or display any insignia, star and crescent, or other mark that might reasonably be calculated to deceive or lead a reasonable person to believe a product is halal if it is not. (C) The department of agriculture shall enforce this section and for such purpose any person designated by the department may enter upon premises where food represented to be halal is sold or exposed for sale, at any reasonable time during business hours to inspect such food. Whenever the department determines that a person is violating this section and has received no previous warning under this section, it shall issue a warning to that person specifying what actions that person needs to take to comply with this section and notifying that person that there is a ten-day period after receipt of the warning to take those actions. If, at the end of the ten-day period, the department determines that the person still is not in compliance with this section, the violator is subject to strict criminal liability, as provided in division (B) of section 2901.21 of the Revised Code. If a person has received a previous warning under this section or has been found in violation of this section, that person shall receive no warning under this division concerning subsequent noncompliance with this section and is subject to strict criminal liability, as provided in division (B) of section 2901.21 of the Revised Code. No action may be maintained against a retail seller for a violation of this section unless: (1) The retail seller fails to comply with a warning issued under division (C) of this section; (2) The retail seller had actual knowledge or should have had knowledge that the product offered for sale did not comply with this section. Sec. 1329.99. (A) Whoever violates section 1329.26 or 1329.27 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars. (B) Whoever violates section 1329.29 or 1329.291 of the Revised Code shall be fined not less than twenty-five nor more than five hundred dollars. (C) Whoever violates section 1329.30 of the Revised Code shall be fined not less than one nor more than twenty-five dollars. (D) Whoever violates section 1329.31, 1329.32, or 1329.33 of the Revised Code shall be fined not less than twenty-five nor more than fifty dollars for a first offense; for each subsequent offense such person shall be fined not less than fifty nor more than two hundred dollars. (E) Whoever violates sections 1329.41 to 1329.53, inclusive, of the Revised Code, shall be fined not less than ten nor more than fifty dollars or imprisoned not less than ten days nor more than one month, or both, for a first offense; for each subsequent offense such person shall be fined not less than twenty nor more than one hundred dollars, or imprisoned not less than thirty days nor more than three months, or both. Sec. 3313.8110. (A) As used in this section, "religious dietary food options" means meals that meet specific food and food preparation techniques that satisfy religious dietary requirements. (B) Each school district shall offer, upon request provided with reasonable notice, religious dietary food options that comply with federal and state nutritional guidelines. However, a district shall not be required to provide a religious dietary food option that exceeds the cost of the federal reimbursement rate for a student's meal. Sec. 3722.20. (A) As used in this section, "religious dietary food options" means meals that meet specific food and food preparation techniques that satisfy religious dietary requirements. (B) Each hospital licensed under this chapter shall offer, upon request provided with reasonable notice, at the hospital, religious dietary food options that comply with federal and state nutritional guidelines. After an individual submits a request for a religious dietary food option, the hospital shall make accommodations for the request as soon as the hospital is able to provide the meals. (C) The provisions of this section shall not infringe upon or affect any obligation in a contract entered into and in effect on or before the effective date of this section. Sec. 5119.335. (A) As used in this section, "religious dietary food options" means meals that meet specific food and food preparation techniques that satisfy religious dietary requirements. (B) Each hospital licensed by the department of mental health and addiction services under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code shall offer, upon request provided with reasonable notice, at the hospital, religious dietary food options that comply with federal and state nutritional guidelines. After an individual submits a request for a religious dietary food option, the hospital shall make accommodations for the request as soon as the hospital is able to provide the meals. (C) The provisions of this section shall not infringe upon or affect any obligation in a contract entered into and in effect on or before the effective date of this section. Sec. 5120.101. (A) As used in this section: (1) "State correctional institution" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Religious dietary food options" means meals that meet specific food and food preparation techniques that satisfy religious dietary requirements. (B) Each state correctional institution shall accommodate the mandatory dietary requirements of a recognized religion practiced by an inmate by offering religious dietary food options. Section 2. That existing sections 1329.29 and 1329.99 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.